apertium-sqi.sqi.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCÇDDhEËFGGjHIJKLLlMNNjOPQRRrSShTThUVXXhYZZhabcçddheëfggjhijklllmnnjopqrrrsshtthuvxxhyzzhWQwq</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"         c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"        c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="num"       c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="adj"       c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="det"       c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="prn"       c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="lig"       c="Ligature"/>
    <sdef n="part"      c="Particle"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"    c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"      c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="pr"        c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="adv"       c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"    c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"    c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="vbser"     c="Verb 'to be' (jam)"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"   c="Verb 'to have' (kam)"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"     c="Standard verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"     c="Modal verb"/>

    <sdef n="pri"       c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="pii"       c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="past"      c="Past definite"/>
    <sdef n="pp"        c="Participle"/>
    <sdef n="imp"       c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="prs"       c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="pio"       c="Present optative"/>
    <sdef n="pra"       c="Present admirative"/>
    <sdef n="pia"       c="Imperfect admirative"/>

    <sdef n="actv"      c="Active"/>
    <sdef n="nactv"     c="Non-active"/>

    <sdef n="p1"        c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"        c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"        c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="f"         c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"         c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"        c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf"        c="Masculine / feminine"/>

    <sdef n="sp"        c="Singular / plural"/>
    <sdef n="sg"        c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"        c="Plural"/>

    <sdef n="ind"       c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"       c="Definite"/>

    <sdef n="nom"       c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"       c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"       c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="dat"       c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="abl"       c="Ablative"/>

    <sdef n="ant"       c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"       c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="top"       c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="al"        c="Other"/>

    <sdef n="pers"      c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="dem"       c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="pos"       c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"       c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="ord"       c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="rel"       c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"       c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="recip"     c="Reciprocal"/>

    <sdef n="sent"      c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"      c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"      c="Right parenthesis"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <!-- Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)?%?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>km</l><r><b/>km<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>m</l><r><b/>m<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>kg</l><r><b/>kg<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><i>-</i><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[:.][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><re>[,]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e> <!-- comma was missing. using the same code as macedonian "cm" -->
	  <e><re>[-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r><p></e> <!-- dash is missing too. using the same code as macedonian "guio" -->
	  <!-- what about apostrophe and double quote? they are missing from both MK and SQ -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="emails">
      <e><re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="urls">
      <e><re>((www.)[a-z\-]+[.][a-z]+)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Particles -->

    <pardef n="do__part">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Ligature -->

    <pardef n="/i__lig">
	  <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>të</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>të</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>të</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>e</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>të</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>të</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>e</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>së</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>të</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>e</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>të</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>të</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>e</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>të</l><r>i<s n="lig"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<!-- Clitics -->
	<pardef n="clitic__clt">
	  <e><p><l>më</l><r>clitic<s n="clt"/><s n="prn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>më</l><r>clitic<s n="clt"/><s n="prn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>të</l><r>clitic<s n="clt"/><s n="prn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>të</l><r>clitic<s n="clt"/><s n="prn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>na</l><r>clitic<s n="clt"/><s n="prn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>na</l><r>clitic<s n="clt"/><s n="prn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ju</l><r>clitic<s n="clt"/><s n="prn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ju</l><r>clitic<s n="clt"/><s n="prn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>e</l><r>clitic<s n="clt"/><s n="prn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>i</l><r>clitic<s n="clt"/><s n="prn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>i</l><r>clitic<s n="clt"/><s n="prn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>u</l><r>clitic<s n="clt"/><s n="prn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
	  <!-- there are also the combined clitics that I wouldn't know how to code here:
	    ma = më + e
		m'i = më + i
		ta = të + e (this is true for particle too like in one of the examples "do TA bëjmë")
		t'i = të + i
		jua = ju + e|i ex: juve jua dhanë librin|librat
		ia = i + e|i ex: atij ia dhanë fletoren|fletoret
		ua = u + e|i
		whose case is "dat + acc" -->
	</pardef>
	  

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="dhe__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="i"><i></i><par n="/i__lig"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="do"><i>do</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="duke"><i>duke</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="le"><i>le</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="jo"><i>jo</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ja"><i>ja</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="mu"><i>mu</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="me"><i>me</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="mos"><i>mos</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="nuk"><i>nuk</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="pa"><i>pa</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="s'"><i>s'</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="të"><i>të</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="të" r="LR"><p><l>ta</l><r>të</r></p><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="u"><i>u</i><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ama"><i>ama</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="apo"><i>apo</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="dhe"><i>dhe</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="e"><i>e</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="edhe"><i>edhe</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ose"><i>ose</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="por"><i>por</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="si edhe"><i>si<b/>edhe</i><par n="dhe__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="për të" r="LR"><p><l>për<b/>t'</l><r>për<b/>të</r></p><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="për të" r="RL"><p><l>për<b/><a/>të</l><r>për<b/>të</r></p><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="të" r="LR"><p><l>t'</l><r>të</r></p><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e lm="të" r="RL"><p><l><a/>të</l><r>të</r></p><par n="do__part"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="emails"/></e>
    <e><par n="urls"/></e>
